Utah statutes.
53A-1-408.   Appropriations reallocation.

(1)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act, the State Board of Education may reallocate between line items appropriations for the support of public education for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2001 and ending June 30, 2002:

(a)  as described in Items 231 through 239 in Laws of Utah 2001, Chapter 334; and

(b)  as modified by:

(i) Laws of Utah 2001, First Special Session, Chapter 5;

(ii)  H.B. 1, 2002 General Session; and

(iii)  H.B. 3, 2002 General Session.

(2)  The total amount of money reallocated under Subsection (1) may not exceed the sum of the reductions made by H.B. 1, 2002 General Session, and H.B. 3, 2002 General Session.



Amended by Chapter 250, 2008 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

